errortag-src/propernoun-sme-morph.txt
LEXICON BERNDECL-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BERN-UCASE-LOAN ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ BERN-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON BERN-UCASE
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
! +Sg+Attr:%> K ; !SUB
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K ; ! ! Ty^dal:s
     BERN-OBL ;
 +Use/Sub:%: BERN-OBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%- BERN-OBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%: LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
 +Use/Sub:%- LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
 
LEXICON BERN-UCASE-LOAN
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
! +Sg+Attr:%> K ; !SUB
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K ; ! ! Ty^dal:s
 +Use/Sub: BERN-OBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%: BERN-OBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%- BERN-OBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%: LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
 +Use/Sub:%- LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +CmpN/SgG:a Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG: K ;
 +Sg+Ill:i K ;
 +Sg+Loc:as K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:an K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ain K ;
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ajd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ajd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ajde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ain K ;
 +Pl+Com:aigujn K ;



!LEXICON BERN-DC						!moved up to -plc
! +Der/laš:alažž DEARVVASLAS ;

LEXICON BERN-OBL
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +CmpN/SgG:a Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG: K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:as K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:an K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ain K ;
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ajd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ajd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ajde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ain K ;
 +Pl+Com:aigujn K ;

!The BERN plural forms are different from CNAME because there is
!a form Peraid from Per in coprus.

LEXICON HEIM-sur   !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> HEIMDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON HEIM-LOAN-plc !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%> HEIMDECL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%>a PLACELASH ; ! ! @U.Cap.Opt@

LEXICON HEIM-plc !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%> HEIMDECL ; !
 :%>a PLACELASH ;! @U.Cap.Opt@


LEXICON HEIMDECL
 HEIM-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@i ACCRA-I ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ma ACCRA-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ma ACCRA-IICASE ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>maž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL !Just to mal, fem, ani

LEXICON HEIM-DC
 @U.Cap.Obl@ HEIM-NE ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ ACCRA-ADJ ;

LEXICON HEIM-NE
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; !
 +Ess:an K ;

LEXICON SUND-sur !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> SUNDDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SUND-LOAN-plc !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%> SUNDDECL ; !
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC2 ; !
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@a DenominalAdjsC2 ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC3 ;    !

LEXICON SUND-plc !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%> SUNDDECL ; !
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@a DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC3 ;    !


LEXICON SUNDDECL
 HEIM-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@i ACCRA-I ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@da ACCRA-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@da ACCRA-IICASE ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>daž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL !just to mal, fem, ani



! From MALIS
!LEXICON DUORTNUS-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

!LEXICON DUORTNUS-sur
! +N+Prop+Plc:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !


!LEXICON DUORTNUS
! +N+Prop:%>DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUS-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ DUORTNUS-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON DUORTNUS-OBL
 +Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7 Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8 Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN:X4 Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4- Rreal ; !
 +Ess:X4in K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X2a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X2 K ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:X2 Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG:X2a Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:X2- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:X2a- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Acc:X2a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X2 K ; !
 +Sg+Ill:X2ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X2is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:X2ijguin K ;

!LEXICON DUORTNUS-DC	!moved up to -plc
! From GAHPIR

LEXICON RANES-plc !Ráneš:Rátnáhii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RANES-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:e%>X4š@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;


LEXICON RANES-OBL
 +Sg+Nom:eX4š K ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:eX7š Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:eX8š Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN:eX4š Rreal ;
 +Ess:eX4šin K ;
 +Sg+Gen:áX2ha K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:áX2t K ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:áX2t Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgG:áX2ha Rreal ;
 +Sg+Acc:áX2ha K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:áX2t K ; !
 +Sg+Ill:áX2hij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:áX2his K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:áX2hin K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:áX2hijn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:áX2hat K ;
 +Pl+Gen:áX2hijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:áX2hijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:áX2hijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:áX2hijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:áX2hijguin K ;

LEXICON CAVKKUS-plc !Čávkkus:Čávkohii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ CAVKKUS-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@us DenominalAdjsC2 ;


LEXICON CAVKKUS-OBL
 +Sg+Nom:kus K ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:kos Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN:kus Rreal ; 
 +Ess:kusin K ;
 +Sg+Gen:oha K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:ot K ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:ot Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgG:oha Rreal ;
 +Sg+Acc:oha K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:ot K ; !
 +Sg+Ill:ohij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:ohis K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:ohin K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ohijn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ohat K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ohijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ohijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ohijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ohijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:ohijguin K ;


LEXICON ANAR-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> ANARDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Ani+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ažž PLACE-DIMV ;

LEXICON ANAR-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> ANARDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ažž PLACE-DIMV ;

LEXICON ANAR-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ANARDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ažž PLACE-DIMV ;

LEXICON ANAR-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> ANARDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !

LEXICON ANAR
 +N+Prop:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANARDECL ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ ANAR-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON ANAR-OBL
 +Attr+Use/Sub: K ;  !
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7 Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:X2 Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG:X2a Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:X2- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:X2a- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub: K ; !
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:ijguin K ;


!LEXICON ANAR-DC	!moved up to -plc

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-ani
! +N+Prop+Ani:%> HEANDARATDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Ani+Der/Dimin:%>aX6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ;


LEXICON HEANDARAT-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Der/Dimin:%>aX6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Der/Dimin:%>aX6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ;

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:aX4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT ;


!LEXICON HEANDARAT ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARATDECL ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
 @U.Cap.Obl@ HEANDARAT-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ HEANDARAT-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON HEANDARAT-OBL
 +Attr+Use/Sub: K ;  !
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN:- Rreal ;
 +Sg+Gen:aX4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:aX4 K ;
 +Sg+Ill:aX3j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:aX4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:aX4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:aX5jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:aX4t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aX5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:aX5jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:aX5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:aX5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:aX5jgujn K ;
 +Ess:an K ;



!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-org
! +N+Prop+Org:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !


!LEXICON GEAVNNIS
! +N+Prop:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNIS-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ GEAVNNIS-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-OBL
 +Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
 +Ess:X4in K ;
 CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8 Rreal ; !
 CmpN/SgN:X4 Rreal ;
 CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8- Rreal ; !
 CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Gen:Y5 K ;
 +CmpN/SgG:Y5 Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:Y5- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Acc:Y5 K ;
 +Sg+Ill:Y5j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:Y5s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:Y5n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:Y5jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:Y5t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Y5jd K ;
 +CmpN/PlG:jd Rreal ;
 +Pl+Acc:Y5jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Y5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:Y5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:Y5jgujn K ;


LEXICON BALAK-plc !singulars on -k
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ BALAK-UCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@k DenominalAdjsC2 ;

LEXICON BALAK-fem !singulars on -k
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ BALAK-UCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON BALAK-org !singulars on -k
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ BALAK-UCASE ;

LEXICON BALAK-sur !singulars on -k
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ BALAK-UCASE ;

LEXICON BALAK-UCASE
 +Sg+Nom:k K ;
 +CmpN/SgN:k Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:k- Rreal ; !
 +Attr+Use/Sub:k K ; !
 +Ess:gin K ;
 +Pl+Nom:gat K ;
 +Pl+Ill:gijdda K ; ! 2-syll stem
 +Sg+Gen:ga K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:k K ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:k Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG:ga Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:k- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:ga- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Acc:ga K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:k K ; !
 +Sg+Ill:gij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:gis K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:gin K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:gijn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:gijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:gijd K ;
 +Pl+Loc:gijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:gijguin K ;

LEXICON SARAK-fem !Sarak:Sarahis
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SARAK-UCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SARAK-plc !singulars on -k
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SARAK-UCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@k DenominalAdjsC2 ;
